Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.59
Medical records; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, use, or other consumption in this state of copies of medical records provided to the patient or a person holding such patient's power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2008, LB916, § 23.